Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.750

Public corporations—Insolvency or dissolution.

In the event of the insolvency or dissolution of a public corporation, commission, or authority, the superior court of the county in which the public corporation, commission, or authority is or was operating shall have jurisdiction and authority to appoint trustees or receivers of corporate property and assets and supervise such trusteeship or receivership: PROVIDED, That all liabilities incurred by such public corporation, commission, or authority shall be satisfied exclusively from the assets and properties of such public corporation, commission, or authority and no creditor or other person shall have any right of action against the city, town, or county creating such corporation, commission or authority on account of any debts, obligations, or liabilities of such public corporation, commission, or authority.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 37 s 6.]